Hawaii statutes.
[§19-3.5] Voter fraud. The following
persons shall be guilty of a class C felony:

(1) Any person who knowingly registers another person
to vote when that person is not entitled to register to vote;

(2) Any person who knowingly votes when the person is
not entitled to vote;

(3) Any person who knowingly takes an oath in this
title prescribed or authorized by law and wilfully makes any false statement of
fact while under oath therein; or

(4) Any person who wilfully makes a false answer to
any question asked of the person while under oath in this title prescribed or
authorized by law. [L 1990, c 115, §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next